test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-25aswq_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - asõq: # Noun (25) asõq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     asõq+N+Sg+Nom: asõq
     asõq+N+Sg+Gen: asõmõ
     asõq+N+Sg+Par: asõnd
     asõq+N+Sg+Ill: asõmõhe
     asõq+N+Sg+Ine: asõmõn
     asõq+N+Sg+Ela: asõmõst
     asõq+N+Sg+All: asõmõlõ
     asõq+N+Sg+Ade: asõmõl
     asõq+N+Sg+Abl: asõmõlt
     asõq+N+Sg+Tra: asõmõs
     asõq+N+Sg+Ter: asõmõniq
     asõq+N+Sg+Abe: asõmõldaq
     asõq+N+Sg+Com: asõmõgaq
     asõq+N+Pl+Nom: asõmõq
     asõq+N+Pl+Gen: asõmidõ
     asõq+N+Pl+Par: asõmit
     asõq+N+Pl+Ill: asõmihe
     asõq+N+Pl+Ine: asõmin
     asõq+N+Pl+Ela: asõmist
     asõq+N+Pl+All: asõmilõ
     asõq+N+Pl+Ade: asõmil
     asõq+N+Pl+Abl: asõmilt
     asõq+N+Pl+Tra: asõmis
     asõq+N+Pl+Ter: asõminiq
     asõq+N+Pl+Abe: asõmildaq
     asõq+N+Pl+Com: asõmidõgaq
